Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.050

Administrative law judge—Motion of prejudice against—Request for assignment of.

(1) Any party to a hearing being conducted under the provisions of this chapter (including the state agency, whether or not it is nominally a party) may file with the chief administrative law judge a motion of prejudice, with supporting affidavit, against the administrative law judge assigned to preside at the hearing. The first such motion filed by any party shall be automatically granted.

(2) Any state agency may request from the chief administrative law judge the assignment of an administrative law judge for the purpose of conducting a rule-making or investigatory proceeding.

[ 1981 c 67 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.